Vermont, session 2025-2026, H47.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 26 V.S.A. chapter 12, subchapter 7 is added to read:
Subchapter 7. Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact
§ 690. DENTIST AND DENTAL HYGIENIST COMPACT; ADOPTION
This subchapter is the Vermont adoption of the Dentist and Dental
Hygienist Compact. The form, format, and text of the Compact have been
conformed to the conventions of the Vermont Statutes Annotated. It is the
intent of the General Assembly that this subchapter be interpreted as
substantively the same as the Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact that is
enacted by other compact party states.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 2 of 45
§ 691. TITLE AND PURPOSE
This statute shall be known and cited as the Dentist and Dental Hygienist
Compact. The purposes of this Compact are to facilitate the interstate practice
of dentistry and dental hygiene and improve public access to dentistry and
dental hygiene services by providing dentists and dental hygienists licensed in
a participating state the ability to practice in participating states in which they
are not licensed. The Compact does this by establishing a pathway for a
dentists and dental hygienists licensed in a participating state to obtain a
compact privilege that authorizes them to practice in another participating state
in which they are not licensed. The Compact enables participating states to
protect the public health and safety with respect to the practice of such dentists
and dental hygienists, through the state’s authority to regulate the practice of
dentistry and dental hygiene in the state. The Compact:
(1) enables dentists and dental hygienists who qualify for a compact
privilege to practice in other participating states without satisfying burdensome
and duplicative requirements associated with securing a license to practice in
those states;
(2) promotes mobility and addresses workforce shortages through each
participating state’s acceptance of a compact privilege to practice in that state;
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 3 of 45
(3) increases public access to qualified, licensed dentists and dental
hygienists by creating a responsible, streamlined pathway for licensees to
practice in participating states;
(4) enhances the ability of participating states to protect the public’s
health and safety;
(5) does not interfere with licensure requirements established by a
participating state;
(6) facilitates the sharing of licensure and disciplinary information
among participating states;
(7) requires dentists and dental hygienists who practice in a participating
state pursuant to a compact privilege to practice within the scope of practice
authorized in that state;
(8) extends the authority of a participating state to regulate the practice
of dentistry and dental hygiene within its borders to dentists and dental
hygienists who practice in the state through a compact privilege;
(9) promotes the cooperation of participating state in regulating the
practice of dentistry and dental hygiene within those states; and
(10) facilitates the relocation of military members and their spouses who
are licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 4 of 45
§ 692. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the
following definitions shall apply:
(1) “Active military member” means any person with full-time duty
status in the armed forces of the United States, including members of the
National Guard and Reserve.
(2) “Adverse action” means disciplinary action or encumbrance imposed
on a license or compact privilege by a state licensing authority.
(3) “Alternative program” means a nondisciplinary monitoring or
practice remediation process applicable to a dentist or dental hygienist
approved by a state licensing authority of a participating state in which the
dentist or dental hygienist is licensed. This includes, but is not limited to,
programs to which licensees with substance abuse or addiction issues are
referred in lieu of adverse action.
(4) “Clinical assessment” means examination or process, required for
licensure as a dentist or dental hygienist as applicable, that provides evidence
of clinical competence in dentistry or dental hygiene.
(5) “Commissioner” means the individual appointed by a participating
state to serve as the member of the Commission for that participating state.
(6) “Compact” means this Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 5 of 45
(7) “Compact privilege” means the authorization granted by a remote
state to allow a licensee from a participating state to practice as a dentist or
dental hygienist in remote state.
(8) “Continuing professional development” means a requirement, as a
condition of license renewal to provide evidence of successful participation in
educational or professional activities relevant to practice or area of work.
(9) “Criminal background check” means the submission of fingerprints
or other biometric-based information for a license applicant for the purpose of
obtaining that applicant’s criminal history record information, as defined in 28
C.F.R. § 20.3(d) from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the state’s
criminal history record repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(f).
(10) “Data system” means the Commission’s repository of information
about licensees, including, but not limited to examination, licensure,
investigative, compact privilege, adverse action, and alternative program.
(11) “Dental hygienist” means an individual who is licensed by a state
licensing authority to practice dental hygiene.
(12) “Dentist” means an individual who is licensed by a state licensing
authority to practice dentistry.
(13) “Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact Commission” or
“Commission” means a joint government agency established by this Compact
comprised of each state that has enacted the Compact and a national
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 6 of 45
administrative body comprised of a commissioner from each state that has
enacted the Compact.
(14) “Encumbered license” means a license that a state licensing
authority has limited in any way other than through an alternative program.
(15) “Executive board” means the chair, vice chair, secretary, and
treasurer, and any other commissioners as may be determined by Commission
rule or bylaw.
(16) “Jurisprudence requirement” means the assessment of an
individual’s knowledge of the laws and rules governing the practice of
dentistry or dental hygiene, as applicable, in a state.
(17) “License” means current authorization by a state, other than
authorization pursuant to a compact privilege, or other privilege, for an
individual to practice as a dentist or dental hygienist in that state.
(18) “Licensee” means an individual who holds an unrestricted license
from a participating state to practice as a dentist or dental hygienist in that
state.
(19) “Model Compact” the model for the Dentist and Dental Hygienist
Compact on file with the Council of State Governments or other entity as
designated by the Commission.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 7 of 45
(20) “Participating state” means a state that has enacted the Compact
and been admitted to the Commission in accordance with the provisions herein
and Commission rules.
(21) “Qualifying license” means a license that is not an encumbered
license issued by a participating state to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.
(22) “Remote state” means a participating state where a licensee who is
not licensed as a dentist or dental hygienist is exercising or seeking to exercise
the compact privilege.
(23) “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the
force of law.
(24) “Scope of practice” means the procedures, actions, and processes a
dentist or dental hygienist licensed in a state is permitted to undertake in that
state and the circumstances under which the licensee is permitted to undertake
those procedures, actions, and processes. Such procedures, actions, and
processes and the circumstances under which they may be undertaken may be
established through means, including, but not limited to, statute, regulations,
case law, and other processes available to the state licensing authority or other
government agency.
(25) “Significant investigative information” means information, records,
and documents received or generated by a state licensing authority pursuant to
an investigation for which a determination has been made that there is probable
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 8 of 45
cause to believe that the licensee has violated a statute or regulation that is
considered more than a minor infraction for which the state licensing authority
could pursue adverse action against the licensee.
(26) “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the
United States of America that regulates the practices of dentistry and dental
hygiene.
(27) “State licensing authority” means an agency or other entity of a
State that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of dentists or dental
hygienists.
§ 693. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
(a) In order to join the Compact and thereafter continue as a participating
state, a state must:
(1) enact a compact that is not materially different from the Model
Compact as determined in accordance with Commission rules;
(2) participate fully in the Commission’s data system;
(3) have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating
complaints about its licensees and license applicants;
(4) notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of the Compact
and Commission rules, of any adverse action or the availability of significant
investigative information regarding a licensee and license applicant;
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 9 of 45
(5) fully implement a criminal background check requirement, within a
time frame established by Commission rule, by receiving the results of a
qualifying criminal background check;
(6) comply with the Commission rules applicable to a participating
state;
(7) accept the National Board Examinations of the Joint Commission on
National Dental Examinations or another examination accepted by
Commission rule as a licensure examination;
(8) accept for licensure that applicants for a dentist license graduate
from a predoctoral dental education program accredited by the Commission on
Dental Accreditation, or another accrediting agency recognized by the U.S.
Department of Education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene
education programs, leading to the Doctor of Dental Surgery (D.D.S.) or
Doctor of Dental Medicine (D.M.D.) degree;
(9) accept for licensure that applicants for a dental hygienist license
graduate from a dental hygiene education program accredited by the
Commission on Dental Accreditation or another accrediting agency recognized
by the U.S. Department of Education for the accreditation of dentistry and
dental hygiene education programs;
(10) require for licensure that applicants successfully complete a clinical
assessment;
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 10 of 45
(11) have continuing professional development requirements as a
condition for license renewal; and
(12) pay a participation fee to the Commission as established by
Commission rule.
(b) Providing alternative pathways for an individual to obtain an
unrestricted license does not disqualify a state from participating in the
Compact.
(c) When conducting a criminal background check, the state licensing
authority shall:
(1) consider that information in making a licensure decision;
(2) maintain documentation of completion of the criminal background
check and background check information to the extent allowed by state and
federal law; and
(3) report to the Commission whether it has completed the criminal
background check and whether the individual was granted or denied a license.
(d) A licensee of a participating state who has a qualifying license in that
state and does not hold an encumbered license in any other participating state
shall be issued a compact privilege in a remote state in accordance with the
terms of the Compact and Commission rules. If a remote state has a
jurisprudence requirement, a compact privilege will not be issued to the
licensee unless the licensee has satisfied the jurisprudence requirement.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 11 of 45
§ 694. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
(a) To obtain and exercise the compact privilege under the terms and
provisions of the Compact, the licensee shall:
(1) have a qualifying license as a dentist or dental hygienist in a
participating state;
(2) be eligible for a compact privilege in any remote state in accordance
with subsections (d), (g), and (h) of this section;
(3) submit to an application process whenever the licensee is seeking a
compact privilege;
(4) pay any applicable Commission and remote state fees for a compact
privilege in the remote state;
(5) meet any jurisprudence requirement established by a remote state in
which the licensee is seeking a compact privilege;
(6) have passed a National Board Examination of the Joint Commission
on National Dental Examinations or another examination accepted by
Commission rule;
(7) for a dentist, have graduated from a predoctoral dental education
program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, or another
accrediting agency recognized by the U.S. Department of Education for the
accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene education programs, leading to
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 12 of 45
the Doctor of Dental Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of Dental Medicine (D.M.D.)
degree;
(8) for a dental hygienist, have graduated from a dental hygiene
education program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation or
another accrediting agency recognized by the U.S. Department of Education
for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene education programs;
(9) have successfully completed a clinical assessment for licensure;
(10) report to the Commission adverse action taken by any
nonparticipating state when applying for a compact privilege and, otherwise,
within 30 days from the date the adverse action is taken;
(11) report to the Commission when applying for a compact privilege
the address of the licensee’s primary residence and thereafter immediately
report to the Commission any change in the address of the licensee’s primary
residence; and
(12) consent to accept service of process by mail at the licensee’s
primary residence on record with the Commission with respect to any action
brought against the licensee by the Commission or a participating state and
consent to accept service of a subpoena by mail at the licensee’s primary
residence on record with the Commission with respect to any action brought or
investigation conducted by the Commission or a participating state.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 13 of 45
(b) The licensee must comply with the requirements of subsection (a) of
this section to maintain the compact privilege in the remote state. If those
requirements are met, the compact privilege will continue as long as the
licensee maintains a qualifying license in the state through which the licensee
applied for the compact privilege and pays any applicable compact privilege
renewal fees.
(c) A licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene in a remote state under
the compact privilege shall function within the scope of practice authorized by
the remote state for a dentist or dental hygienist licensed in that state.
(d) A licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene pursuant to a compact
privilege in a remote state is subject to that state’s regulatory authority. A
remote state may, in accordance with due process and that state’s laws, by
adverse action revoke or remove a licensee’s compact privilege in the remote
state for a specific period of time and impose fines or take any other necessary
actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens. If a remote state imposes
an adverse action against a compact privilege that limits the compact privilege,
that adverse action applies to all compact privileges in all remote states. A
licensee whose compact privilege in a remote state is removed for a specified
period of time is not eligible for a compact privilege in any other remote state
until the specific time for removal of the compact privilege has passed and all
encumbrance requirements are satisfied.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 14 of 45
(e) If a license in a participating state is an encumbered license, the licensee
shall lose the compact privilege in a remote state and shall not be eligible for a
compact privilege in any remote state until the license is no longer
encumbered.
(f) Once an encumbered license in a participating state is restored to good
standing, the licensee must meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section to obtain a compact privilege in a remote state.
(g) If a licensee’s compact privilege in a remote state is removed by the
remote state, the individual shall lose or be ineligible for the compact privilege
in any remote state until the following occur:
(1) the specific period of time for which the compact privilege was
removed has ended; and
(2) all conditions for removal of the compact privilege have been
satisfied.
(h) Once the requirements of subsection (g) of this section have been met,
the licensee must meet the requirements in subsection (a) of this section to
obtain a compact privilege in a remote state.
§ 695. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER OR THEIR SPOUSE
An active military member and their spouse shall not be required to pay to
the Commission for a compact privilege the fee otherwise charged by the
Commission. If a remote state chooses to charge a fee for a compact privilege,
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 15 of 45
it may choose to charge a reduced fee or no fee to an active military member
and their spouse for a compact privilege.
§ 696. ADVERSE ACTIONS
(a) A participating state in which a licensee is licensed shall have exclusive
authority to impose adverse action against the qualifying license issued by that
participating state.
(b) A participating state may take adverse action based on the significant
investigative information of a remote state, so long as the participating state
follows its own procedures for imposing adverse action.
(c) Nothing in this Compact shall override a participating state’s decision
that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse
action and that such participation shall remain nonpublic if required by the
participating state’s laws. Participating states must require licensees who enter
any alternative program in lieu of discipline to agree not to practice pursuant to
a compact privilege in any other participating state during the term of the
alternative program without prior authorization from such other participating
state.
(d) Any participating state in which a licensee is applying to practice or is
practicing pursuant to a compact privilege may investigate actual or alleged
violations of the statutes and regulations authorizing the practice of dentistry or
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 16 of 45
dental hygiene in any other participating state in which the dentist or dental
hygienist holds a license or compact privilege.
(e) A remote state shall have the authority to:
(1) Take adverse actions as set forth in subsection 694(d) of this title
against a licensee’s compact privilege in the state.
(2) In furtherance of its rights and responsibilities under the Compact
and the Commission’s rules, issue subpoenas for both hearings and
investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the
production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a state licensing authority in a
participating state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses, or the
production of evidence from another participating state, shall be enforced in
the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice
and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings
pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel
expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the State
where the witnesses or evidence are located.
(3) If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the licensee the
costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any adverse
action taken against that licensee.
(f) Joint investigations.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 17 of 45
(1) In addition to the authority granted to a participating state by its
dentist or dental hygienist licensure act or other applicable state law, a
participating state may jointly investigate licensees with other participating
states.
(2) Participating states shall share any significant investigative
information, litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or
individual investigation initiated under the Compact.
(g) Authority to continue investigation.
(1) After a licensee’s compact privilege in a remote state is terminated,
the remote state may continue an investigation of the licensee that began when
the licensee had a compact privilege in that remote state.
(2) If the investigation yields what would be significant investigative
information had the licensee continued to have a compact privilege in that
remote state, the remote state shall report the presence of such information to
the data system as required by subdivision 698(b)(6) of this title as if it was
significant investigative information.
§ 697. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE COMMISSION
(a) Commission. The Compact participating states hereby create and
establish a joint government agency whose membership consists of all
participating states that have enacted the Compact. The Commission is an
instrumentality of the participating states acting jointly and not an
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 18 of 45
instrumentality of any one state. The Commission shall come into existence on
or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth in subsection 701(a) of
this title.
(b) Participation, voting, and meetings.
(1) Each participating state shall have and be limited to one
commissioner selected by that participating state’s state licensing authority or,
if the state has more than one state licensing authority, selected collectively by
the state licensing authorities.
(2) The commissioner shall be a member or designee of such authority
or authorities.
(3) The Commission may by rule or bylaw establish a term of office for
commissioners and may by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
(4) The Commission may recommend to a state licensing authority or
authorities, as applicable, removal or suspension of an individual as the state’s
commissioner.
(5) A participating state’s state licensing authority, or authorities, as
applicable, shall fill any vacancy of its commissioner on the Commission
within 60 days of the vacancy.
(6) Each commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all matters that
are voted upon by the Commission.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 19 of 45
(7) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The Commission
may meet by telecommunication, video conference or other similar electronic
means.
(c) Powers. The Commission shall have the following powers:
(1) Establish the fiscal year of the Commission.
(2) Establish a code of conduct and conflict of interest policies.
(3) Adopt rules and bylaws.
(4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws.
(5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of
this Compact, the Commission’s rules, and the bylaws.
(6) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Commission, provided that the standing of any state licensing authority to sue
or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected.
(7) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a
participating state as the authenticated business records of the Commission and
designate a person to do so on the Commission’s behalf.
(8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds.
(9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but
not limited to, employees of a participating state.
(10) Conduct an annual financial review.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 20 of 45
(11) Hire employees; elect or appoint officers; fix compensation; define
duties; grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of
the Compact; and establish the Commission’s personnel policies and programs
relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related
personnel matters.
(12) As set forth in the Commission rules, charge a fee to a licensee for
the grant of a compact privilege in a remote state and thereafter, as may be
established by Commission rule, charge the licensee a compact privilege
renewal fee for each renewal period in which that licensee exercises or intends
to exercise the compact privilege in that remote state. Nothing herein shall be
construed to prevent a remote state from charging a licensee a fee for a
compact privilege or renewals of a compact privilege or a fee for the
jurisprudence requirement if the remote state imposes such a requirement for
the grant of a compact privilege.
(13) Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money,
other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services and
receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the
Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest,
or both.
(14) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property,
real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 21 of 45
(15) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed.
(16) Establish a budget and make expenditures.
(17) Borrow money.
(18) Appoint committees, including standing committees, which may be
composed of members, state regulators, state legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other interested
persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws.
(19) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law
enforcement agencies.
(20) Elect a chair, vice chair, secretary, and treasurer, and such other
officers of the Commission as provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
(21) Establish and elect an executive board.
(22) Adopt and provide to the participating states an annual report.
(23) Determine whether a state’s enacted compact is materially different
from the Model Compact language such that the state would not qualify for
participation in the Compact.
(24) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to
achieve the purposes of this Compact.
(d) Meetings of the Commission.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 22 of 45
(1) All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to this
subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings shall be
posted on the Commission’s website at least 30 days prior to the public
meeting.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Commission
may convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least 24 hours’
prior notice on the Commission’s website, and any other means as provided in
the Commission’s rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with notice of
proposed rulemaking under subsection 699(l) of this title. The Commission’s
legal counsel shall certify that one of the reasons justifying an emergency
public meeting has been met.
(3) Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the time, date, and
location of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be held or accessible via
telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic means, the notice
shall include the mechanism for access to the meeting through such means.
(4) The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting for
the Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
(A) noncompliance of a participating state with its obligations under
the Compact;
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 23 of 45
(B) the employment, compensation, discipline or other matters,
practices or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to
the Commission’s internal personnel practices and procedures;
(C) current or threatened discipline of a licensee or compact privilege
holder by the Commission or by a participating state’s licensing authority;
(D) current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
(E) negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods,
services, or real estate;
(F) accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
(G) trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is
privileged or confidential;
(H) information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
(I) investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
(J) information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on
behalf of or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with
responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant
to the Compact;
(K) legal advice;
(L) matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the public by
federal or participating state law; and
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 24 of 45
(M) other matters as promulgated by the Commission by rule.
(5) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer
shall state that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant
exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
(6) The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe
all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of
the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action
shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of
the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(e) Financing of the Commission.
(1) The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
(2) The Commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of
revenue, donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services.
(3) The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from
each participating state and impose fees on licensees of participating states
when a compact privilege is granted to cover the cost of the operations and
activities of the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 25 of 45
sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each fiscal year for which
sufficient revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual
assessment amount for participating states shall be allocated based upon a
formula that the Commission shall promulgate by rule.
(4) The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to
securing the funds adequate to meet the same, nor shall the Commission pledge
the credit of any participating state, except by and with the authority of the
participating state.
(5) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established under its
bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission
shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed public
accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included in and
become part of the annual report of the Commission.
(f) The executive board.
(1) The executive board shall have the power to act on behalf of the
Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties, and
responsibilities of the executive board shall include:
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 26 of 45
(A) overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the
Compact including compliance with the provisions of the Compact, the
Commission’s rules and bylaws;
(B) recommending to the Commission changes to the rules or
bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to compact
participating states, fees charged to licensees, and other fees;
(C) ensuring Compact administration services are appropriately
provided, including by contract;
(D) preparing and recommending the budget;
(E) maintaining financial records on behalf of the Commission;
(F) monitoring Compact compliance of participating states and
providing compliance reports to the Commission;
(G) establishing additional committees as necessary;
(H) exercising the powers and duties of the Commission during the
interim between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending rules,
adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties
expressly reserved to the Commission by rule or bylaw; and
(I) other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the Commission.
(2) The executive board shall be composed of up to seven members.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 27 of 45
(A) The chair, vice chair, secretary, and treasurer of the Commission,
and any other members of the Commission who serve on the executive board
shall be voting members of the executive board; and
(B) other than the chair, vice chair, secretary, and treasurer, the
Commission may elect up to three voting members from the current
membership of the Commission.
(3) The Commission may remove any member of the executive board as
provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
(4) The executive board shall meet at least annually.
(A) An executive board meeting at which it takes or intends to take
formal action on a matter shall be open to the public, except that the executive
board may meet in a closed, nonpublic session of a public meeting when
dealing with any of the matters covered under subdivision (d)(4) of this
section.
(B) The executive board shall give five business days’ notice of its
public meetings, posted on its website and as it may otherwise determine to
provide notice to persons with an interest in the public matters the executive
board intends to address at those meetings.
(5) The executive board may hold an emergency meeting when acting
for the Commission to:
(A) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 28 of 45
(B) prevent a loss of Commission or participating state funds; or
(C) protect public health and safety.
(g) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification.
(1) The members, officers, executive director, employees, and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability,
both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or
loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising
out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the
person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing
occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, provided that nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or
liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission shall
not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
(2) The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee, and representative of the Commission in any civil action
seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the person against
whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 29 of 45
the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that
nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their
own counsel at their own expense, and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct.
(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, should any
member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the
Commission be held liable for the amount of any settlement or judgment
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within
the scope of that individual’s employment, duties, or responsibilities for the
Commission, or that the person to whom that individual is liable had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of the individual’s
employment, duties, or responsibilities for the Commission, the Commission
shall indemnify and hold harmless such individual, provided that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or
wanton misconduct of the individual.
(4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of
any licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be
governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
(5) Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise
abrogate a participating state’s state action immunity or state action affirmative
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 30 of 45
defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or
any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
(6) Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the participating states or by the Commission.
§ 698. DATA SYSTEM
(a) The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system
containing licensure, adverse action, and the presence of significant
investigative information on all licensees and applicants for a license in
participating states.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a
participating state shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all
individuals to whom this Compact is applicable as required by the rules of the
Commission, including:
(1) identifying information;
(2) licensure data;
(3) adverse actions against a licensee, license applicant, or Compact
privilege and information related thereto;
(4) nonconfidential information related to alternative program
participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other
information related to such participation;
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 31 of 45
(5) any denial of an application for licensure, and the reason or reasons
for such denial, excluding the reporting of any criminal history record
information where prohibited by law;
(6) the presence of significant investigative information; and
(7) other information that may facilitate the administration of this
Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the rules of the
Commission.
(c) The records and information provided to a participating state pursuant
to this Compact or through the data system, when certified by the Commission
or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the
Commission and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any
relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a
participating state.
(d) Significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any
participating state will only be available to other participating states.
(e) It is the responsibility of the participating states to monitor the database
to determine whether adverse action has been taken against a licensee or
license applicant. Adverse action information pertaining to a licensee or
license applicant in any participating state will be available to any other
participating state.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 32 of 45
(f) Participating states contributing information to the data system may
designate information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing state.
(g) Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the participating state
contributing the information shall be removed from the data system.
§ 699. RULEMAKING
(a) The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the Compact. A Commission rule shall be invalid and have no
force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is
invalid because the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a
manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers
granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
(b) The rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each
participating state, provided however that where the rules of the Commission
conflict with the laws of the participating state that establish the participating
state’s scope of practice as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the rules
of the Commission shall be ineffective in that state to the extent of the conflict.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 33 of 45
(c) The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the
criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall
become binding as of the date specified by the Commission for each rule.
(d) If a majority of the legislatures of the participating states rejects a
Commission rule or portion of a Commission rule, by enactment of a statute or
resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact, within four years of
the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and
effect in any participating state or to any state applying to participate in the
Compact.
(e) Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the
Commission.
(f) Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall hold a
public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data,
facts, opinions, and arguments.
(g) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the Commission, and at least 30
days in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public
hearing on the proposed rule, the Commission shall provide a notice of
proposed rulemaking:
(1) on the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible
platform;
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 34 of 45
(2) to persons who have requested notice of the Commission’s notices of
proposed rulemaking; and
(3) in such other way as the Commission may by rule specify.
(h) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
(1) the time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the
Commission will hear public comments on the proposed rule and, if different,
the time, date, and location of the meeting where the Commission will consider
and vote on the proposed rule;
(2) if the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or
other electronic means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for
access to the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
(3) the text of the proposed rule and the reason therefore;
(4) a request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested
person; and
(5) the manner in which interested persons may submit written
comments.
(i) All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written
comments and documents received by the Commission in response to the
proposed rule shall be available to the public.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 35 of 45
(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing
on each Commission rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the
Commission at hearings required by this section.
(k) The Commission shall, by majority vote of all commissioners, take
final action on the proposed rule based on the rulemaking record.
(1) The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule, provided
the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
(2) The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for
substantive changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons for
substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
(3) The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the
rule. Except for an emergency as provided in subsection (l) of this section, the
effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than 30 days after the Commission
issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
(l) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency rule with 24 hours’ notice, with opportunity
to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the
Compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days after the effective date of
the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must
be adopted immediately in order to:
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 36 of 45
(1) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(2) prevent a loss of Commission or participating state funds;
(3) meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by
federal law or rule; or
(4) protect public health and safety.
(m) The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may
direct revisions to a previously adopted rule for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical
errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a
period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on
grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge
shall be made in writing and delivered to the Commission prior to the end of
the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without
further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect
without the approval of the Commission.
(n) No participating state’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
Compact.
§ 700. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
(a) Oversight.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 37 of 45
(1) The executive and judicial branches of state government in each
participating state shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary
and appropriate to implement the Compact.
(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent
jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is located. The
Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it
adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any
action against a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such
similar matter.
(3) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact or
Commission rule and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for
all purposes. Failure to provide the Commission service of process shall
render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this Compact, or
promulgated rules.
(b) Default, technical assistance, and termination.
(1) If the Commission determines that a participating state has defaulted
in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or
the promulgated rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 38 of 45
defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed
means of curing the default, and any other action that the Commission may
take, and shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the
default.
(2) The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the
other participating states.
(c) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be
terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
Commissioners, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred on that state
by this Compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A
cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or
liabilities incurred during the period of default.
(d) Termination of participation in the Compact shall be imposed only after
all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent
to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the governor, the
majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, the
defaulting state’s state licensing authority or authorities, as applicable, and
each of the participating states’ state licensing authority or authorities, as
applicable.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 39 of 45
(e) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination,
including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
(f) Upon the termination of a state’s participation in this Compact, that
state shall immediately provide notice to all licensees of the state, including
licensees of other participating states issued a compact privilege to practice
within that state, of such termination. The terminated state shall continue to
recognize all compact privileges then in effect in that state for a minimum of
180 days after the date of said notice of termination.
(g) The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found
to be in default or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed
upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting state.
(h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by
petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal
district where the Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party
shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s
fees.
(i) Dispute resolution.
(1) Upon request by a participating state, the Commission shall attempt
to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among participating states
and between participating states and nonparticipating states.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 40 of 45
(2) The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
(j) Enforcement.
(1) The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall
enforce the provisions of this Compact and the Commission’s rules.
(2) By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action against a
participating state in default in the U.S. District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices
to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated
rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In
the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees. The
remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The
Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or the
defaulting participating state’s law.
(3) A participating state may initiate legal action against the
Commission in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated rules. The
relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 41 of 45
judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
(4) No individual or entity other than a participating state may enforce
this Compact against the Commission.
§ 701. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
(a) The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh participating state.
(1) On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission
shall convene and review the enactment of each of the states that enacted
the Compact prior to the Commission convening (charter participating
states) to determine if the statute enacted by each such charter
participating state is materially different than the Model Compact.
(A) A charter participating state whose enactment is found to be
materially different from the Model Compact shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in section 700 of this title.
(B) If any participating state is later found to be in default, or is
terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall remain
in existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of
participating states should be less than seven.
(2) Participating states enacting the Compact subsequent to the
charter participating states shall be subject to the process set forth in
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 42 of 45
subdivision 697(c)(23) of this title to determine if their enactments are
materially different from the Model Compact and whether they qualify for
participation in the Compact.
(3) All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to
the effective date of the Compact or the Commission coming into
existence shall be considered to be actions of the Commission unless
specifically repudiated by the Commission.
(4) Any state that joins the Compact subsequent to the
Commission’s initial adoption of the rules and bylaws shall be subject to
the Commission’s rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the
Compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously
adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on
the day the Compact becomes law in that state.
(b) Any participating state may withdraw from this Compact by
enacting a statute repealing that state’s enactment of the Compact.
(1) A participating state’s withdrawal shall not take effect 180 days
after enactment of the repealing statute.
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing state’s licensing authority or authorities to comply with the
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 43 of 45
investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this Compact
prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
(3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this
Compact, the state shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to
all licensees within that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory
enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to
recognize all compact privileges to practice within that state granted
pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date of such
notice of withdrawal.
(c) Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate
or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement
between a participating state and a nonparticipating state that does not
conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
(d) This Compact may be amended by the participating states. No
amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any
participating state until it is enacted into the laws of all participating
states.
§ 702. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
(a) This Compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the
implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions of the
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 44 of 45
Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules
shall not be construed to limit the Commission’s rulemaking authority
solely for those purposes.
(b) The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any
phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this Compact is held by a court of
competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any
participating state, a State seeking participation in the Compact, or of the
United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency,
person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and
the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or
circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Commission
may deny a state’s participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the
requirements of subsection 700(b) of this title, terminate a participating
state’s participation in the Compact, if it determines that a constitutional
requirement of a participating state is a material departure from the
Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the
constitution of any participating state, the Compact shall remain in full
force and effect as to the remaining participating states and in full force
and effect as to the participating state affected as to all severable matters.
VT LEG #378322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.47
2025 Page 45 of 45
§ 703. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE
LAWS
(a) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law
of a participating state that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
(b) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a
participating state in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of
the conflict.
(c) All permissible agreements between the Commission and the
participating states are binding in accordance with their terms.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378322 v.1